Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 90,510,656
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 12,644,874
SECTION 2. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, which  are to be dis-
tributed as grants-in-aid, for program costs  and to purchase services, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Early intervention services
and early childhood special
education programs .................. $194,371,463
(2) Other special education
programs................................... $ 47,815,323
(3) Nutrition programs ................... $ 6,179,816
(4) Other K-12 grant-in-aid
programs................................... $ 56,979,952
(5) Oregon prekindergarten
program .................................... $156,415,847
(6) Other early learning
programs................................... $ 99,520,232
(7) Youth development programs ... $ 14,100,833
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding ORS 327.856, there is appropriated to the Department of
Education, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the General Fund, the amount of
$169,985,861 for deposit in the High School  Graduation and College and Career Readiness
Fund.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Department  of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $32,479,290 for  debt service
on Article XI-P general obligation bonds.
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $692,870
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the Department of Education  from lottery moneys allocated from the Oregon
Education Fund to the  department for debt service on outstanding state education lottery
bonds.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses, other than expenses described in sections 7 and 10 of this 2019  Act, from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following  pur-
poses:
(1) Capital bonding ......................... $130,000,000
(2) Operations................................. $ 46,360,200
(3) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 6,281,693
(4) Debt service for outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
pursuant to Article XI-P of the
Oregon Constitution.................. $ 1
SECTION 7.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from fees, moneys or  other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education for programs other than those  specified in sections
6 and 10 of this 2019 Act, for the following purposes:
(1) Early learning programs ........... $ 11,870,941
(2) Youth development programs ... $ 6,070,103
(3) Educator Advancement Council $ 35,790,625
(4) All other grants ........................ $246,367,143
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from federal funds, other than those described in sections 9 and 10 of this 2019
Act, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 92,274,061
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 247,179
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of grants-in-aid,  program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than those
described in sections 8 and 10 of this  2019 Act, received by the Department of Education, for
the following purposes:
(1) Early learning programs ........... $169,913,048
(2) Youth development programs ... $ 453,500
(3) All other grants ........................ $846,883,384
SECTION 10. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, the following expenditures by the
Department of Education are not limited:
(1) Moneys  from the School Lunch Revolving Account, Education Training Revolving
Account and Common School Fund; and
(2) Expenditures for grants-in-aid and purchased services from federal funds received  by
the Department of Education from the United States Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 11. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 3